Nevada, session 83, AB147.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Proof of identity” means any of the following forms
of identification which show the name of and contain a
recognizable photograph of the person to whom the identification
is issued:
-
*AB147*

– 3 –
1. A driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles.
2. An identification card issued by:
(a) This State or another state, the District of Columbia or any
territory of the United States;
(b) The United States Government;
(c) A college or university within the Nevada System of Higher
Education; or
(d) A public technical school in this State.
3. An employee identification card issued by this State, an
agency or political subdivision thereof, or the United States
Government.
4. A passport issued by the United States Government.
5. A military identification card issued by any branch of the
Armed Forces of the United States.
6. An identification card issued by a federally recognized
Indian tribe.
7. A permit to carry a concealed firearm issued pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 202.3653 to 202.369, inclusive,
 which is, except as otherwise provided by specific statute,
current or expired for less than 4 years or, if the holder is 70 years
of age or older, current or expired for any length of time.
Sec. 3. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall issue an
identification card at no charge to a person who:
1. Is a registered voter of this State;
2. Does not possess a form of proof of identity described in
section 2 of this act;
3. Attests that he or she is experiencing a financial hardship;
and
4. Submits an application pursuant to NRS 483.850 and
section 4 of this act.
Sec. 4. 1. A person who wishes to obtain an identification
card at no charge pursuant to section 3 of this act must, in
addition to the requirements of NRS 483.850, submit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles:
(a) Proof that the applicant is a registered voter of this State;
and
(b) An attestation that he or she is experiencing a financial
hardship.
2. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not require a
person who submits an application pursuant to this section to
provide proof of financial hardship.
Sec. 5. NRS 293.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 293.016 to 293.121,
-
*AB147*

– 4 –
inclusive, and section 2 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 6. NRS 293.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.165
and 293.166, a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a
primary election unless the person named has filed a declaration of
candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid the filing fee
required by NRS 293.193 not earlier than:
(a) For a candidate for judicial office, the first Monday in
January of the year in which the election is to be held and not later
than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in January;
and
(b) For all other candidates, the first Monday in March of the
year in which the election is to be held and not later than 5 p.m. on
the second Friday after the first Monday in March.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
(a) For partisan office:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the ................ Party nomination for
the office of ........., I, the undersigned ........, do swear or
affirm under penalty of perjury that I actually, as opposed to
constructively, reside at .........., in the City or Town of .......,
County of .........., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed
to constructive, residence in the State, district, county,
township, city or other area prescribed by law to which the
office pertains began on a date at least 30 days immediately
preceding the date of the close of filing of declarations of
candidacy for this office; that my telephone number is
............, and the address at which I receive mail, if different
than my residence, is .........; that I am registered as a member
of the ................ Party; that I am a qualified elector pursuant
to Section 1 of Article 2 of the Constitution of the State of
Nevada; that if I have ever been convicted of treason or a
felony, my civil rights have been restored; that I have not, in
violation of the provisions of NRS 293.176, changed the
designation of my political party or political party affiliation
-
*AB147*

– 5 –
on an official application to register to vote in any state since
December 31 before the closing filing date for this election;
that I generally believe in and intend to support the concepts
found in the principles and policies of that political party in
the coming election; that if nominated as a candidate of the
................ Party at the ensuing election, I will accept that
nomination and not withdraw; that I will not knowingly
violate any election law or any law defining and prohibiting
corrupt and fraudulent practices in campaigns and elections in
this State; that I will qualify for the office if elected thereto,
including, but not limited to, complying with any limitation
prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this State
concerning the number of years or terms for which a person
may hold the office; that I understand that knowingly and
willfully filing a declaration of candidacy which contains a
false statement is a crime punishable as a gross misdemeanor
and also subjects me to a civil action disqualifying me from
entering upon the duties of the office; and that I understand
that my name will appear on all ballots as designated in this
declaration.

................................................................
(Designation of name)

................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

(b) For nonpartisan office:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of ................, I, the
-
*AB147*

– 6 –
undersigned ................, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside at
........., in the City or Town of ......., County of ........., State of
Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to constructive, residence
in the State, district, county, township, city or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is ..........., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..........; that I
am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that if nominated as a nonpartisan candidate at the
ensuing election, I will accept the nomination and not
withdraw; that I will not knowingly violate any election law
or any law defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent
practices in campaigns and elections in this State; that I will
qualify for the office if elected thereto, including, but not
limited to, complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of this State concerning the number of
years or terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.

................................................................
(Designation of name)

................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

3. The address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
-
*AB147*

– 7 –
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to his or her
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the documents and
proof of [identity and] residency provided by the candidate pursuant
to subsection 3 or 4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the filing officer for the office as his or
her agent for service of process for the purposes of a proceeding
-
*AB147*

– 8 –
pursuant to NRS 293.182. Service of such process must first be
attempted at the appropriate address as specified by the candidate in
the declaration of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at
that address, service must be made by personally delivering to and
leaving with the filing officer duplicate copies of the process. The
filing officer shall immediately send, by registered or certified mail,
one of the copies to the candidate at the specified address, unless the
candidate has designated in writing to the filing officer a different
address for that purpose, in which case the filing officer shall mail
the copy to the last address so designated.
7. If the filing officer receives credible evidence indicating that
a candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the filing officer:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the Attorney General, if the filing officer is the
Secretary of State, or to the district attorney, if the filing officer is a
person other than the Secretary of State.
8. The receipt of information by the Attorney General or
district attorney pursuant to subsection 7 must be treated as a
challenge of a candidate pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS
293.182 to which the provisions of NRS 293.2045 apply.
9. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 7. NRS 293.269913 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269913 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
NRS 293.269911 and chapter 293D of NRS, the county clerk shall
send to each active registered voter by first-class mail, or by any
class of mail if the Official Election Mail logo or an equivalent logo
or mark created by the United States Postal Service is properly
placed:
(a) A mail ballot;
(b) A return envelope [;] , which must include, without
limitation, a flap to cover the signature and identifying numbers of
the voter required to be written on the return envelope pursuant to
NRS 293.269917;
(c) An envelope or sleeve into which the mail ballot is inserted
to ensure its secrecy; and
(d) Instructions.
2. In sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the
county clerk shall use an envelope that may not be forwarded to an
-
*AB147*

– 9 –
address of the voter that is different from the address to which the
mail ballot is mailed.
3. The return envelope must include postage prepaid by first-
class mail if the active registered voter is within the boundaries of
the United States, its territories or possessions or on a military base.
4. Before sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the
county clerk shall record:
(a) The date the mail ballot is issued;
(b) The name of the voter to whom the mail ballot is issued, his
or her precinct or district and his or her political affiliation, if any,
unless all the offices on the mail ballot are nonpartisan offices;
(c) The number of the mail ballot; and
(d) Any remarks the county clerk finds appropriate.
5. The Secretary of State shall prescribe:
(a) The form of all envelopes in which mail ballots are sent to
voters and return envelopes, which must, except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b), be uniform throughout the State; and
(b) A method for distinguishing the return envelopes of each
county which must be prominently displayed on the outside of the
return envelope.
Sec. 8. NRS 293.269917 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269917 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293.269919 and chapter 293D of NRS, in order to vote a mail ballot,
the voter must, in accordance with the instructions:
(a) Mark and fold the mail ballot;
(b) Deposit the mail ballot in the return envelope and seal the
return envelope;
(c) Affix his or her signature on the return envelope in the space
provided for the signature; [and]
(d) Write in the space provided on the return envelope one of
the following:
(1) The last four digits of his or her driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the last four digits of
his or her social security number; or
(3) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a social security
number, the identification number issued by the county clerk
pursuant to NRS 293.507;
(e) Close the attached flap over the signature and identifying
numbers written on the return envelope; and
(f) Mail or deliver the return envelope in a manner authorized by
law.
-
*AB147*

– 10 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 293D of NRS,
voting must be only upon candidates whose names appear upon the
mail ballot as prepared pursuant to NRS 293.269911, and no person
may write in the name of an additional candidate for any office.
3. If a mail ballot has been sent to a voter who applies to vote
in person at a polling place, including, without limitation, a polling
place for early voting, the voter must, in addition to complying with
all other requirements for voting in person that are set forth in this
chapter, surrender his or her mail ballot or sign an affirmation under
penalty of perjury that the voter has not voted during the election. A
person who receives a surrendered mail ballot shall mark it
“Cancelled.”
Sec. 9. NRS 293.269927 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269927 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293D.200, when a mail ballot is returned by or on behalf of a voter
to the county clerk, and a record of its return is made in the mail
ballot record for the election, the clerk or an employee in the office
of the clerk shall [check] :
(a) Verify that the last four digits of the driver’s license
number or social security number, as applicable, written on the
return envelope match the information of the voter in the records
of the county clerk;
(b) If, pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 of NRS 293.269917, the voter has written the
identification number issued by the county clerk pursuant to NRS
293.507, verify that the identification number matches the
information of the voter in the records of the county clerk; and
(c) Check the signature used for the mail ballot by electronic
means pursuant to subsection 2 or manually pursuant to
subsection 3.
2. To check the signature used for a mail ballot by electronic
means:
(a) The electronic device must take a digital image of the
signature used for the mail ballot and compare the digital image
with the signatures of the voter from his or her application to
register to vote or application to preregister to vote available in the
records of the county clerk.
(b) If the electronic device does not match the signature of the
voter, the signature shall be reviewed manually pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 3.
3. To check the signature used for a mail ballot manually, the
county clerk shall use the following procedure:
-
*AB147*

– 11 –
(a) The clerk or employee shall check the signature used for the
mail ballot against all signatures of the voter available in the records
of the clerk.
(b) If at least two employees in the office of the clerk believe
there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, the clerk
shall contact the voter and ask the voter to confirm whether the
signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter.
4. For purposes of subsection 3:
(a) There is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if the signature used for the mail ballot differs in multiple,
significant and obvious respects from the signatures of the voter
available in the records of the clerk.
(b) There is not a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if:
(1) The signature used for the mail ballot is a variation of the
signature of the voter caused by the substitution of initials for the
first or middle name, the substitution of a different type of
punctuation in the first, middle or last name, the use of a common
nickname or the use of one last name for a person who has two last
names and it does not otherwise differ in multiple, significant and
obvious respects from the signatures of the voter available in the
records of the clerk; or
(2) There are only slight dissimilarities between the signature
used for the mail ballot and the signatures of the voter available in
the records of the clerk.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if the clerk
determines that the voter is entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk
shall deposit the mail ballot in the proper ballot box or place the
mail ballot, unopened, in a container that must be securely locked or
under the control of the clerk at all times. The clerk shall deliver the
mail ballots to the mail ballot central counting board to be processed
and prepared for counting.
6. If the clerk determines when checking the signature used for
the mail ballot that the voter failed to affix his or her signature or
failed to affix it in the manner required by law for the mail ballot or
that there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, but the
voter is otherwise entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk shall
contact the voter and advise the voter of the procedures to provide a
signature or a confirmation that the signature used for the mail ballot
belongs to the voter, as applicable. For the mail ballot to be counted,
-
*AB147*

– 12 –
the voter must provide a signature or a confirmation, as applicable,
not later than 5 p.m. on the sixth day following the election.
7. The clerk shall prescribe procedures for a voter who failed to
affix his or her signature or failed to affix it in the manner required
by law for the mail ballot, or for whom there is a reasonable
question of fact as to whether the signature used for the mail ballot
matches the signature of the voter, in order to:
(a) Contact the voter;
(b) Allow the voter to provide a signature or a confirmation that
the signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter, as
applicable; and
(c) After a signature or a confirmation is provided, as applicable,
ensure the mail ballot is delivered to the mail ballot central counting
board.
8. If there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter,
the voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the county clerk covering the
personal data which is reported on the application to register to vote;
(b) Providing the county clerk, orally or in writing, with other
personal data which verifies the identity of the voter; or
(c) [Providing] Presenting the county clerk with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
9. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 7 for
contacting a voter must require the clerk to contact the voter, as
soon as possible after receipt of the mail ballot, by:
(a) Mail;
(b) Telephone, if a telephone number for the voter is available in
the records of the clerk; and
(c) Electronic means, which may include, without limitation,
electronic mail, if the voter has provided the clerk with sufficient
information to contact the voter by such means.
Sec. 10. NRS 293.2725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2725 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in
NRS 293.3081, 293.3083 and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, and
in federal law, in addition to any other requirement to vote, a
person who registers to vote by mail or computer or is registered to
vote by an automatic voter registration agency, or a person who
preregisters to vote by mail or computer and is subsequently deemed
to be registered to vote, and who has not previously voted in an
election for federal office in this State:
(a) May vote at a polling place only if the person presents to the
election board officer at the polling place:
-
*AB147*

– 13 –
(1) A current and valid photo identification of the person,
which shows his or her physical address; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck,
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card; and
(b) May vote by mail only if the person provides to the county
or city clerk:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification of the
person, which shows his or her physical address; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck,
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card.
 If there is a question as to the physical address of the person, the
election board officer or clerk may request additional information.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person who:
(a) Registers to vote by mail or computer, or preregisters to vote
by mail or computer and is subsequently deemed to be registered to
vote, and submits with an application to preregister or register to
vote:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck,
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, registers to
vote by mail or computer and submits with an application to register
to vote a driver’s license number or at least the last four digits of his
or her social security number, if a state or local election official has
matched that information with an existing identification record
bearing the same number, name and date of birth as provided by the
person in the application;
(c) Registers to vote pursuant to NRS 293.5768 to 293.57699,
inclusive, and at that time presents to the automatic voter
registration agency:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification;
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card; or
(3) A driver’s license number or at least the last four digits of
his or her social security number, if a state or local election official
has matched that information with an existing identification record
-
*AB147*

– 14 –
bearing the same number, name and date of birth as provided by the
person in the application;
(d) Is entitled to vote an absent ballot pursuant to the Uniformed
and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et
seq.;
(e) Is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person under
the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act, 52
U.S.C. §§ 20101 et seq.; or
(f) Is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other
federal law.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 apply to a person described
in paragraph (b) of subsection 2 if the voter registration card issued
to the person is mailed by the county clerk to the person and
returned to the county clerk by the United States Postal Service.
Sec. 11. NRS 293.277 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.277 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283,
293.541, 293.57691 and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, if a
person’s name appears in the roster or if the person provides an
affirmation pursuant to NRS 293.525, the person is entitled to vote
and must [sign] :
(a) Present proof of identity; and
(b) Sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature card
when he or she applies to vote. The signature must be compared by
an election board officer with the signature or a facsimile thereof on
the person’s application to register to vote or [one of the forms of
identification listed in subsection 2.] on his or her proof of identity.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.2725, the forms
of identification which may be used individually to identify a voter
at the polling place are:
(a) The voter registration card issued to the voter;
(b) A driver’s license;
(c) An identification card issued by the Department of Motor
Vehicles;
(d) A military identification card; or
(e) Any other form of identification issued by a governmental
agency which contains the voter’s signature and physical description
or picture.
3.] The county clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by
the Secretary of State, to verify that the voter has not already voted
in that county in the current election.
Sec. 12. NRS 293.283 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.283 1. If, because of physical limitations, a registered
voter is unable to sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature
card as required by NRS 293.277, the voter must be identified by:
(a) Either:
-
*AB147*

– 15 –
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote;
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
voter; [or] and
[(c) Providing]
(b) Presenting the election board officer with his or her proof
of [identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
2. If the identity of the voter is verified, the election board
officer shall indicate in the roster “Identified” by the voter’s name.
Sec. 13. NRS 293.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.285 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283
and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive:
(a) A registered voter applying to vote shall state his or her
name to the election board officer in charge of the roster; and
(b) The election board officer shall:
(1) Announce the name of the registered voter;
(2) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity;
(3) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or signature
card;
[(3)] (4) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.277; and
[(4)] (5) Verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that county in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature does not match, the registered voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote;
(b) Providing the election board officer, orally or in writing,
with other personal data which verifies the identity of the registered
voter; or
(c) [Providing the election board officer with proof of
identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] Comparing the signature of
the registered voter on the roster to the signature on the registered
voter’s proof of identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to preregister or
register to vote, the registered voter must update his or her signature
on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
-
*AB147*

– 16 –
Sec. 14. NRS 293.287 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.287 1. A registered voter applying to vote at any primary
election or presidential preference primary election shall give his or
her name and political affiliation, if any, to the election board officer
in charge of the roster, and the officer shall immediately announce
the name and political affiliation [.] and require that the registered
voter present proof of identity.
2. Any person’s right to vote may be challenged by any
registered voter upon:
(a) Any of the grounds allowed for a challenge in NRS 293.303;
(b) The ground that the person applying does not belong to the
political party designated upon the roster; or
(c) The ground that the roster does not show that the person
designated the political party to which he or she claims to belong.
3. Any such challenge must be disposed of in the manner
provided by NRS 293.303.
4. A registered voter who has designated on his or her
application to register to vote an affiliation with a minor political
party may vote a nonpartisan ballot at the primary election.
Sec. 15. NRS 293.3025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3025 The Secretary of State and each county and city clerk
shall ensure that a copy of each of the following is posted in a
conspicuous place at each polling place on election day:
1. A sample ballot;
2. Information concerning the date and hours of operation of
the polling place;
3. Instructions for voting and casting a ballot, including a
provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive,
or a provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive;
4. Instructions concerning the proof of identity required to
vote at the polling place;
5. Instructions concerning the identification required for
persons who registered by mail or computer and are first-time voters
for federal office in this State;
[5.] 6. Information concerning the accessibility of polling
places to persons with disabilities;
[6.] 7. General information concerning federal and state laws
which prohibit acts of fraud and misrepresentation; and
[7.] 8. Information concerning the eligibility of a candidate, a
ballot question or any other matter appearing on the ballot as a result
of a judicial determination or by operation of law, if any.
Sec. 16. NRS 293.303 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.303 1. A person applying to vote may be challenged:
-
*AB147*

– 17 –
(a) Orally by any registered voter of the precinct upon the
ground that he or she is not the person entitled to vote as claimed or
has voted before at the same election. A registered voter who
initiates a challenge pursuant to this paragraph must submit an
affirmation that is signed under penalty of perjury and in the form
prescribed by the Secretary of State stating that the challenge is
based on the personal knowledge of the registered voter.
(b) On any ground set forth in a challenge filed with the county
clerk pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.547.
2. If a person is challenged, an election board officer shall
tender the challenged person the following oath or affirmation:
(a) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not belong to the political party designated upon the roster, “I
swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I belong to the political
party designated upon the roster”;
(b) If the challenge is on the ground that the roster does not
show that the challenged person designated the political party to
which he or she claims to belong, “I swear or affirm under penalty
of perjury that I designated on the application to register to vote the
political party to which I claim to belong”;
(c) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not reside at the residence for which the address is listed in the
roster, “I swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I reside at the
residence for which the address is listed in the roster”;
(d) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
previously voted a ballot for the election, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I have not voted for any of the candidates or
questions included on this ballot for this election”; or
(e) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person is
not the person he or she claims to be, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I am the person whose name is in this roster.”
 The oath or affirmation must be set forth on a form prepared by
the Secretary of State and signed by the challenged person under
penalty of perjury.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if the
challenged person refuses to execute the oath or affirmation so
tendered, the person must not be issued a ballot, and the election
board officer shall indicate in the roster “Challenged” by the
person’s name.
4. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 2, the
election board officers shall issue the person a nonpartisan ballot.
5. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (c) of subsection 2, the election
-
*AB147*

– 18 –
board officers shall inform the person that he or she is entitled to
vote only in the manner prescribed in NRS 293.304.
6. If the challenged person executes the oath or affirmation and
the challenge is not based on the ground set forth in paragraph (e) of
subsection 2, the election board officers shall issue the person a
partisan ballot.
7. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(c) of subsection 2, and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
until he or she furnishes satisfactory identification which contains
proof of the address at which the person actually resides. For the
purposes of this subsection, a voter registration card does not
provide proof of the address at which a person resides.
8. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(e) of subsection 2 and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
unless the person [:
(a) Furnishes official identification which contains a photograph
of the person, such as a driver’s license or other official document;
or
(b) Brings before the election board officers a person who is at
least 18 years of age who:
(1) Furnishes official identification which contains a
photograph of that person, such as a driver’s license or other official
document; and
(2) Executes an oath or affirmation under penalty of perjury
that the challenged person is who he or she swears to be.] furnishes
proof of identity.
9. The election board officers shall:
(a) Record on the challenge list:
(1) The name of the challenged person;
(2) The name of the registered voter who initiated the
challenge; and
(3) The result of the challenge; and
(b) If possible, orally notify the registered voter who initiated
the challenge of the result of the challenge.
Sec. 17. NRS 293.3075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3075 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283
and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot at a polling place established pursuant to NRS
293.3072, the election board officer shall:
(a) Determine [that] whether the person is a registered voter in
the county and has not already voted in that county in the current
election;
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity;
-
*AB147*

– 19 –
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or a signature
card; and
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.277.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature of the registered voter does not match, the registered voter
must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with his or her proof
of [identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The county clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by
the Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not
already voted in that county in the current election.
5. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
where he or she applies to vote.
6. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical voting device for the registered
voter;
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district
and the form of the ballot are indicated on the voting receipt, if the
county clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
7. A registered voter applying to vote at a polling place
established pursuant to NRS 293.3072 may be challenged pursuant
to NRS 293.303.
Sec. 18. NRS 293.3081 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3081 A person at a polling place may cast a provisional
ballot in an election pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086,
-
*AB147*

– 20 –
inclusive, if the person complies with the applicable provisions of
NRS 293.3082 and:
1. Declares that he or she has registered to vote and is eligible
to vote at that election in that jurisdiction, but [his or her] :
(a) The name of the person does not appear on a voter
registration list as a voter eligible to vote in that election in that
jurisdiction [or an] ;
(b) An election official asserts that the person is not eligible to
vote in that election in that jurisdiction; or
(c) The person fails to present proof of identity;
2. Applies by mail or computer, on or after January 1, 2003, to
register to vote and has not previously voted in an election for
federal office in this State and fails to provide the identification
required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725
to the election board officer at the polling place; or
3. Declares that he or she is entitled to vote after the polling
place would normally close as a result of a court order or other order
extending the time established for the closing of polls pursuant to a
law of this State in effect 10 days before the date of the election.
Sec. 19. NRS 293.3082 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3082 1. Before a person may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to NRS 293.3081, the person must complete a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election board officer, as
prescribed by the Secretary of State, at the polling place which
includes:
(a) The name of the person casting the provisional ballot;
(b) The reason for casting the provisional ballot;
(c) A statement in which the person casting the provisional
ballot affirms under penalty of perjury that he or she is a registered
voter in the jurisdiction and is eligible to vote in the election;
(d) The date and type of election;
(e) The signature of the person casting the provisional ballot;
(f) The signature of the election board officer;
(g) A unique affirmation identification number assigned to the
person casting the provisional ballot;
(h) If the person is casting the provisional ballot pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 293.3081:
(1) An indication by the person as to whether or not he or she
provided the required identification at the time the person applied to
register to vote;
(2) The address of the person as listed on the application to
register to vote;
(3) Information concerning the place, manner and
approximate date on which the person applied to register to vote;
-
*AB147*

– 21 –
(4) Any other information that the person believes may be
useful in verifying that the person has registered to vote; and
(5) A statement informing the voter that if the voter does not
provide [identification] proof of identity at the time the voter casts
the provisional ballot, the required [identification] proof of identity
must be provided to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on
the Friday following election day and that failure to do so will result
in the provisional ballot not being counted;
(i) If the person is casting the provisional ballot pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 293.3081:
(1) The address of the person as listed on the application to
register to vote;
(2) The voter registration number, if any, issued to the
person; and
(3) A statement informing the voter that the required
identification must be provided to the county or city clerk not later
than 5 p.m. on the Friday following election day and that failure to
do so will result in the provisional ballot not being counted; and
(j) If the person is casting the provisional ballot pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 293.3081, the voter registration number, if any,
issued to the person.
2. After a person completes a written affirmation pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) The election board officer shall provide the person with a
receipt that includes the unique affirmation identification number
described in subsection 1 and that explains how the person may use
the free access system established pursuant to NRS 293.3086 to
ascertain whether the person’s vote was counted, and, if the vote
was not counted, the reason why the vote was not counted;
(b) The voter’s name and applicable information must be
entered into the roster in a manner which indicates that the voter
cast a provisional ballot; and
(c) The election board officer shall issue a provisional ballot to
the person to vote.
Sec. 20. NRS 293.3085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3085 1. Following each election, a canvass of the
provisional ballots cast in the election must be conducted pursuant
to NRS 293.387 and, if appropriate, pursuant to NRS 293C.387.
2. The county and city clerk shall not:
(a) Include any provisional ballot in the unofficial results
reported on election night; or
(b) Open any envelope containing a provisional ballot before 8
a.m. on the Wednesday following election day.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a provisional
ballot must be counted if:
-
*AB147*

– 22 –
(a) The county or city clerk determines that the person who cast
the provisional ballot was registered to vote in the election, eligible
to vote in the election and issued the appropriate ballot for the
address at which the person resides;
(b) A voter who failed to provide required identification at the
polling place or with his or her mailed ballot provides the required
identification to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the
Friday following election day [;] , including, if applicable, his or
her proof of identity; or
(c) A court order has not been issued by 5 p.m. on the Friday
following election day directing that provisional ballots cast
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 293.3081 not be counted, and the
provisional ballot was cast pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 293.3081.
4. A provisional ballot must not be counted if the county or
city clerk determines that the person who cast the provisional ballot
cast the wrong ballot for the address at which the person resides.
Sec. 21. NRS 293.356 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.356 If a request is made to vote early by a registered voter
in person, the election board shall , except as otherwise provided in
NRS 293.3585, issue a ballot for early voting to the voter. Such a
ballot must be voted on the premises of a polling place for early
voting established pursuant to NRS 293.3564, 293.3572, 293.3575
or 298.690.
Sec. 22. NRS 293.3585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3585 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.283
and 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot for early voting, an election board officer
shall:
(a) Determine [that] whether the person is a registered voter in
the county.
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity.
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster for early voting
or a signature card.
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.277.
[(d)] (e) Verify that the registered voter has not already voted in
that county in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature of the registered voter does not match, the registered voter
must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
-
*AB147*

– 23 –
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The county clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by
the Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not
already voted in that county in the current election.
5. The roster for early voting or a signature card, as applicable,
must contain:
(a) The registered voter’s name, the address where he or she is
registered to vote, his or her voter identification number and a place
for the registered voter’s signature;
(b) The registered voter’s precinct or voting district number, if
that information is available; and
(c) The date of voting early in person.
6. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
for early voting.
7. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical recording device for the registered
voter;
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district,
if that information is available, and the form of ballot are indicated
on the voting receipt, if the county clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
8. A registered voter applying to vote early by personal
appearance may be challenged pursuant to NRS 293.303.
9. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
Sec. 23. NRS 293.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.505 1. All justices of the peace, except those located in
county seats, are ex officio field registrars to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
-
*AB147*

– 24 –
2. The county clerk shall appoint at least one registered voter to
serve as a field registrar of voters who, except as otherwise provided
in NRS 293.5055, shall preregister and register voters within the
county for which the field registrar is appointed. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 1, a candidate for any office may
not be appointed or serve as a field registrar. A field registrar serves
at the pleasure of the county clerk and shall perform such duties as
the county clerk may direct. The county clerk shall not knowingly
appoint any person as a field registrar who has been convicted of a
felony involving theft or fraud. The Secretary of State may bring an
action against a county clerk to collect a civil penalty of not more
than $5,000 for each person who is appointed as a field registrar in
violation of this subsection. Any civil penalty collected pursuant to
this subsection must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit
to the State General Fund.
3. A field registrar shall demand of any person who applies for
preregistration or registration all information required by the
application to preregister or register to vote, as applicable, and shall
administer all oaths required by this chapter.
4. When a field registrar has in his or her possession five or
more completed applications to preregister or register to vote, the
field registrar shall forward them to the county clerk, but in no case
may the field registrar hold any number of them for more than 10
days.
5. Each field registrar shall forward to the county clerk all
completed applications in his or her possession immediately after
the last day to register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or
293C.527, as applicable. Within 5 days after the last day to register
to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527, as
applicable, a field registrar shall return all unused applications in his
or her possession to the county clerk. If all of the unused
applications are not returned to the county clerk, the field registrar
shall account for the unreturned applications.
6. Each field registrar shall submit to the county clerk a list of
the serial numbers of the completed applications to preregister or
register to vote and the names of the electors on those applications.
The serial numbers must be listed in numerical order.
7. Each field registrar shall post notices sent to him or her by
the county clerk for posting in accordance with the election laws of
this State.
8. A field registrar, employee of a voter registration agency or
person assisting a voter pursuant to NRS 293.5235 shall not:
(a) Delegate any of his or her duties to another person; or
(b) Refuse to preregister or register a person on account of that
person’s political party affiliation.
-
*AB147*

– 25 –
9. A person shall not hold himself or herself out to be or
attempt to exercise the duties of a field registrar unless the person
has been so appointed.
10. A county clerk, field registrar, employee of a voter
registration agency or person assisting another person pursuant to
NRS 293.5235 shall not:
(a) Solicit a vote for or against a particular question or
candidate;
(b) Speak to a person on the subject of marking his or her ballot
for or against a particular question or candidate; or
(c) Distribute any petition or other material concerning a
candidate or question which will be on the ballot for the ensuing
election,
 while preregistering or registering the person.
11. When the county clerk receives applications to preregister
or register to vote from a field registrar, the county clerk shall issue
a receipt to the field registrar. The receipt must include:
(a) The number of persons preregistered or registered; and
(b) The political party of the persons preregistered or registered.
12. A county clerk, field registrar, employee of a voter
registration agency or person assisting another person pursuant to
NRS 293.5235 shall not:
(a) Knowingly:
(1) Register a person who is not a qualified elector or a
person who has filed a false or misleading application to register to
vote; or
(2) Preregister a person who does not meet the qualifications
set forth in NRS 293.4855; or
(b) Preregister or register a person who fails to provide
satisfactory [proof] evidence of [identification] his or her identity
and the address at which the person actually resides.
13. A county clerk, field registrar, employee of a voter
registration agency, person assisting another person pursuant to
NRS 293.5235 or any other person providing a form for the
application to preregister or register to vote to an elector for the
purpose of preregistering or registering to vote:
(a) If the person who assists another person with completing the
form for the application to preregister or register to vote retains the
form, shall enter his or her name on the duplicate copy or receipt
retained by the person upon completion of the form; and
(b) Shall not alter, deface or destroy an application to preregister
or register to vote that has been signed by a person except to correct
information contained in the application after receiving notice from
the person that a change in or addition to the information is required.
-
*AB147*

– 26 –
14. If a field registrar violates any of the provisions of this
section, the county clerk shall immediately suspend the field
registrar and notify the district attorney of the county in which the
violation occurred.
15. A person who violates any of the provisions of subsection
8, 9, 10, 12 or 13 is guilty of a category E felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 24. NRS 293.517 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.517 1. Any person who meets the qualifications set forth
in NRS 293.4855 residing within the county may preregister to vote
and any elector residing within the county may register to vote:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.560 and
293C.527, by appearing before the county clerk, a field registrar or a
voter registration agency, completing the application to preregister
or register to vote, giving true and satisfactory answers to all
questions relevant to his or her identity and right to preregister or
register to vote, and providing [proof] evidence of residence and
identity [;] in accordance with this subsection;
(b) By completing and mailing or personally delivering to the
county clerk an application to preregister or register to vote pursuant
to the provisions of NRS 293.5235;
(c) Pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.5727 or chapter 293D
of NRS;
(d) At his or her residence with the assistance of a field registrar
pursuant to NRS 293.5237;
(e) By submitting an application to preregister or register to vote
by computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671; or
(f) By any other method authorized by the provisions of this
title.
 The county clerk shall require a person to submit official
identification as [proof] evidence of residence and identity [,] in
accordance with this subsection, such as a driver’s license or other
official document, before preregistering or registering the person. If
the applicant preregisters or registers to vote pursuant to this
subsection and fails to provide [proof] evidence of residence and
identity, the applicant must provide [proof] evidence of residence
and identity before casting a ballot in person or by mail or after
casting a provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086,
inclusive. For the purposes of this subsection, a voter registration
card does not provide [proof] evidence of the residence or identity
of a person.
2. In addition to the methods for registering to vote described
in subsection 1, an elector may register to vote pursuant to:
(a) NRS 293.269951, if applicable;
-
*AB147*

– 27 –
(b) NRS 293.5768 to 293.57699, inclusive; or
(c) NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5768 to
293.57699, inclusive, the application to preregister or register to
vote must be signed and verified under penalty of perjury by the
person preregistering or the elector registering.
4. Each person or elector who is or has been married must be
preregistered or registered under his or her own given or first name,
and not under the given or first name or initials of his or her spouse.
5. A person or an elector who is preregistered or registered and
changes his or her name must complete a new application to
preregister or register to vote, as applicable. The person or elector
may obtain a new application:
(a) At the office of the county clerk or field registrar;
(b) By submitting an application to preregister or register to vote
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.5235;
(c) By submitting a written statement to the county clerk
requesting the county clerk to mail an application to preregister or
register to vote;
(d) At any voter registration agency; or
(e) By submitting an application to preregister or register to vote
by computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671.
 If the elector fails to register under his or her new name, the
elector may be challenged pursuant to the provisions of NRS
293.303 or 293C.292 and may be required to furnish [proof]
evidence of his or her identity and subsequent change of name.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8 and NRS
293.5768 to 293.57699, inclusive, and 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive, an elector who registers to vote pursuant to paragraph (a)
of subsection 1 shall be deemed to be registered upon the
completion of an application to register to vote.
7. After the county clerk determines that the application to
register to vote of a person is complete and that, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 293D.210, the person is eligible to vote pursuant
to NRS 293.485, the county clerk shall issue a voter registration
card to the voter.
8. If a person or an elector submits an application to preregister
or register to vote or an affidavit described in paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 293.507 that contains any handwritten
additions, erasures or interlineations, the county clerk may object to
the application if the county clerk believes that because of such
handwritten additions, erasures or interlineations, the application is
incomplete or that, except as otherwise provided in NRS 293D.210,
the person is not eligible to preregister pursuant to NRS 293.4855 or
-
*AB147*

– 28 –
the elector is not eligible to vote pursuant to NRS 293.485, as
applicable. If the county clerk objects pursuant to this subsection, he
or she shall immediately notify the person or elector, as applicable,
and the district attorney of the county. Not later than 5 business days
after the district attorney receives such notification, the district
attorney shall advise the county clerk as to whether:
(a) The application is complete and, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 293D.210, the person is eligible to preregister
pursuant to NRS 293.4855 or the elector is eligible to vote pursuant
to NRS 293.485; and
(b) The county clerk should proceed to process the application.
9. If the district attorney advises the county clerk to process the
application pursuant to subsection 8, the county clerk shall
immediately issue a voter registration card to the applicant, unless
the applicant is preregistered to vote and does not currently meet the
requirements to be issued a voter registration card pursuant to
NRS 293.4855.
Sec. 25. NRS 293.541 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.541 1. The county clerk shall cancel the preregistration
of a person or the registration of a voter if:
(a) After consultation with the district attorney, the district
attorney determines that there is probable cause to believe that
information in the application to preregister or register to vote
concerning the identity or residence of the person or voter is
fraudulent;
(b) The county clerk provides a notice as required pursuant to
subsection 2 or executes an affidavit of cancellation pursuant to
subsection 3; and
(c) The person or voter fails to present satisfactory [proof]
evidence of identity and residence pursuant to subsection 2, 4 or 5.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the county
clerk shall notify the person or voter by registered or certified mail,
return receipt requested, of a determination made pursuant to
subsection 1. The notice must set forth the grounds for cancellation.
Unless the person or voter, within 15 days after the return receipt
has been filed in the office of the county clerk, presents satisfactory
[proof] evidence of identity and residence to the county clerk, the
county clerk shall cancel the person’s preregistration or the voter’s
registration, as applicable.
3. If insufficient time exists before a pending election to
provide the notice required by subsection 2 to a registered voter, the
county clerk shall execute an affidavit of cancellation and attach a
copy of the affidavit of cancellation in the roster.
4. If a voter appears to vote at the election next following the
date that an affidavit of cancellation was executed for the voter
-
*AB147*

– 29 –
pursuant to this section, the voter must be allowed to vote only if the
voter furnishes:
(a) [Official identification which contains a photograph] Proof
of [the voter, including, without limitation, a driver’s license or
other official document;] identity; and
(b) Satisfactory [identification that contains proof] evidence of
the address at which the voter actually resides and that address is
consistent with the address listed on the roster.
5. If a determination is made pursuant to subsection 1
concerning information in the registration to vote of a voter and a
mail ballot is received from the voter, the mail ballot must be kept
separate from other ballots and must not be counted unless the voter
presents satisfactory [proof] evidence to the county clerk of identity
and residence before such ballots are counted on election day.
6. For the purposes of this section, a voter registration card
does not provide [proof] evidence of the:
(a) Address at which a person actually resides; or
(b) Residence or identity of a person.
Sec. 26. NRS 293.5768 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5768 1. The following agencies are automatic voter
registration agencies:
(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services;
(c) Any agency designated by the Director of the Department of
Health and Human Services to receive applications for Medicaid;
(d) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange created by
NRS 695I.200;
(e) Any agency that has been designated by the Governor as an
automatic voter registration agency pursuant to NRS 293.57682; and
(f) Any agency of an Indian tribe that has been designated by the
Governor to be an automatic voter registration agency pursuant to
NRS 293.57684.
2. If, in the normal course of business, an automatic voter
registration agency collects sufficient information that demonstrates
a person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS 293.485, including,
without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity, citizenship,
residence and date of birth, the provisions of NRS 293.5768 to
293.57699, inclusive, apply to the automatic voter registration
agency when a person submits any of the following:
(a) An application for the issuance or renewal of or change of
address for any type of driver’s license or identification card issued
by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) An application for Medicaid through the system established
by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 422.2703;
-
*AB147*

– 30 –
(c) An application for health insurance through the Silver State
Health Insurance Exchange; and
(d) An application for any service or assistance from an
automatic voter registration agency described in paragraph (e) or (f)
of subsection 1.
3. An automatic voter registration agency shall not:
(a) Request any additional information for purposes of voter
registration that is not required in the normal course of business; and
(b) Transmit any information about a person using the system
established pursuant to NRS 293.57686 if the person did not provide
the agency in the normal course of business sufficient information
that demonstrates the person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS
293.485, including, without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity,
citizenship, residence and date of birth.
Sec. 27. NRS 293.57682 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57682 1. The Governor may designate any agency in the
Executive Department of the State Government not described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 293.5768 as
an automatic voter registration agency if the agency collects in the
regular course of business from a person applying to the agency to
receive any service or assistance sufficient information that
demonstrates a person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS 293.485,
including, without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity,
citizenship, residence and date of birth.
2. Upon the designation of an agency as an automatic voter
registration agency pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The Governor shall notify the Secretary of State; and
(b) The Secretary of State and the automatic voter registration
agency shall comply with the provisions of NRS 293.57686.
Sec. 28. NRS 293.57684 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57684 1. If an Indian reservation or Indian colony is
located in whole or in part within a county, the Indian tribe may
submit a request to the Governor for approval to allow an agency of
the tribe to become an automatic voter registration agency in order
to submit voter registration information of tribal members to the
Secretary of State and the database created by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.675 for the purpose of registering tribal
members to vote or updating the voter registration information of
tribal members for the purpose of correcting the statewide voter
registration list pursuant to NRS 293.530.
2. If the Governor finds that the tribal agency collects in the
regular course of business from a person applying to the agency to
receive any service or assistance sufficient information that
-
*AB147*

– 31 –
demonstrates the person is qualified to vote pursuant to NRS
293.485, including, without limitation, [proof] evidence of identity,
citizenship, residence and date of birth:
(a) The Governor shall designate the tribal agency as an
automatic voter registration agency; and
(b) The Secretary of State and the Indian tribe shall comply with
the provisions of NRS 293.57686.
Sec. 29. NRS 293.57691 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57691 1. A county clerk shall not reject as an application
to register to vote the information received from an automatic voter
registration agency solely on the basis that the information does not
contain an electronic facsimile of the signature of the person who is
applying to vote or update his or her voter registration information
on the statewide voter registration list.
2. If the county clerk does not receive an electronic facsimile
of the signature of the person from the automatic voter registration
agency, the county clerk must obtain the person’s signature or an
electronic facsimile of the person’s signature through one of the
following methods:
(a) Through the notice provided by the county clerk to the
person pursuant to NRS 293.57693, if the notice is returned to
the county clerk by the person and the returned notice includes the
person’s signature;
(b) Requesting an electronic facsimile of the person’s signature
from the Department of Motor Vehicles or another state agency;
(c) Requesting the person to submit an electronic facsimile of
the person’s signature through a method approved by the Secretary
of State; or
(d) Requesting the person to sign a paper or electronic form the
first time the person applies to vote in person at a polling place,
including, without limitation, a polling place for early voting by
personal appearance. A signature provided by a person pursuant to
this paragraph must be compared to one of the forms of
[identification] the person’s proof of identity which [may be used
individually to identify a voter at the polling place set forth in NRS
293.277] includes his or her signature before the person is allowed
to vote in person.
3. In addition to the requirements of this section and NRS
293.2725, a person who is registered to vote pursuant to NRS
293.5768 to 293.57699, inclusive, must provide an affirmation
signed under penalty of perjury that the person is eligible to vote the
first time a person votes in person or by mail ballot if the person has
not already provided such an affirmation to the county clerk.
-
*AB147*

– 32 –
Sec. 30. NRS 293.5837 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5837 1. An elector may register to vote in the county or
city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote by
submitting an application to register to vote by computer using the
system established by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
293.671 before the elector appears at a polling place described in
subsection 2 to vote in person.
2. If an elector submits an application to register to vote
pursuant to this section less than 14 days before the election, the
elector may vote only in person:
(a) During the period for early voting, at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote; or
(b) On the day of the election, at:
(1) A polling place established pursuant to NRS 293.3072 or
293C.3032 in the county or city, as applicable, in which the elector
is eligible to vote; or
(2) The polling place for his or her election precinct.
3. To vote in person, an elector who submits an application to
register to vote pursuant to this section must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place described
in subsection 2;
(b) Inform an election board officer that, before appearing at the
polling place, the elector submitted an application to register to vote
by computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671; and
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as [proof] evidence of the elector’s identity and residency.
4. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
-
*AB147*

– 33 –
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
5. Subject to final verification, if an elector submits an
application to register to vote and appears at a polling place to vote
in person pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the elector submitted the
application to register to vote by computer using the system
established by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671 and
that the application to register to vote is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot, unless it is
verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to register to vote
and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that polling place.
Sec. 31. NRS 293.5842 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5842 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote in person during the period for early
voting, an elector must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place for early
voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as applicable, in
which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
-
*AB147*

– 34 –
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as [proof] evidence of the elector’s identity and residency.
3. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. Subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in
person at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot, unless it is
verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to register to vote
and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that polling place.
Sec. 32. NRS 293.5847 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5847 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person on the day of the election at
any polling place in the county or city, as applicable, in which the
elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote on the day of the election, an elector
must:
-
*AB147*

– 35 –
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place in the
county or city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as [proof] evidence of the elector’s identity and residency.
3. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. Subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in
person at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
-
*AB147*

– 36 –
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot.
Sec. 33. NRS 293.775 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.775 1. A person who is not a qualified elector and who
votes or attempts to vote knowing that he or she is not a qualified
elector is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished as
provided in NRS 193.130.
2. A person who votes or attempts to vote using the name of
another person , including, without limitation, voting the mail
ballot of another person, is guilty of a category D felony and shall
be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 34. NRS 293C.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.185 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293C.190,
a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a primary or
general city election unless the person named has, in accordance
with NRS 293C.145 or 293C.175, as applicable, timely filed a
declaration of candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid
the filing fee established by the governing body of the city.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

City of ..............................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of .................., I,
.................., the undersigned do swear or affirm under penalty
of perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside
at .................., in the City or Town of .................., County of
.................., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to
constructive, residence in the city, township or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is .................., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..................;
that I am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2
of the Constitution of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever
been convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have
been restored; that if nominated as a candidate at the ensuing
-
*AB147*

– 37 –
election I will accept the nomination and not withdraw; that I
will not knowingly violate any election law or any law
defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent practices in
campaigns and elections in this State; that I will qualify for
the office if elected thereto, including, but not limited to,
complying with any limitation prescribed by the Constitution
and laws of this State concerning the number of years or
terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.

................................................................
(Designation of name)

................................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

......................................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

3. The address of a candidate that must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
-
*AB147*

– 38 –
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the [proof] evidence
of identity and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to
subsection 3 or 4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the city clerk as his or her agent for
service of process for the purposes of a proceeding pursuant to NRS
293C.186. Service of such process must first be attempted at the
appropriate address as specified by the candidate in the declaration
of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at that address,
service must be made by personally delivering to and leaving with
the city clerk duplicate copies of the process. The city clerk shall
immediately send, by registered or certified mail, one of the copies
to the candidate at the specified address, unless the candidate has
designated in writing to the city clerk a different address for that
purpose, in which case the city clerk shall mail the copy to the last
address so designated.
7. If the city clerk receives credible evidence indicating that a
candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the city clerk:
-
*AB147*

– 39 –
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the city attorney.
8. The receipt of information by the city attorney pursuant to
subsection 7 must be treated as a challenge of a candidate pursuant
to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 293C.186 to which the provisions of
NRS 293.2045 apply.
9. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 35. NRS 293C.26312 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26312 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
NRS 293C.263 and chapter 293D of NRS, the city clerk shall send
to each active registered voter by first-class mail, or by any class of
mail if the Official Election Mail logo or an equivalent logo or mark
created by the United States Postal Service is properly placed:
(a) A mail ballot;
(b) A return envelope [;] , which must include, without
limitation, a flap to cover the signature and identifying numbers of
the voter required to be written on the return envelope pursuant to
NRS 293C.26316;
(c) An envelope or sleeve into which the mail ballot is inserted
to ensure its secrecy; and
(d) Instructions.
2. In sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the city
clerk shall use an envelope that may not be forwarded to an address
of the voter that is different from the address to which the mail
ballot is mailed.
3. The return envelope must include postage prepaid by first-
class mail if the active registered voter is within the boundaries of
the United States, its territories or possessions or on a military base.
4. Before sending a mail ballot to an active registered voter, the
city clerk shall record:
(a) The date the mail ballot is issued;
(b) The name of the voter to whom the mail ballot is issued, his
or her precinct or district and his or her political affiliation, if any,
unless all the offices on the mail ballot are nonpartisan offices;
(c) The number of the mail ballot; and
(d) Any remarks the city clerk finds appropriate.
5. The Secretary of State shall prescribe:
-
*AB147*

– 40 –
(a) The form of all envelopes in which mail ballots are sent to
voters and return envelopes, which must, except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b), be uniform throughout the State; and
(b) A method for distinguishing the return envelopes of each
city which must be prominently displayed on the outside of the
return envelope.
Sec. 36. NRS 293C.26316 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26316 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293C.26318 and chapter 293D of NRS, in order to vote a mail
ballot, the voter must, in accordance with the instructions:
(a) Mark and fold the mail ballot;
(b) Deposit the mail ballot in the return envelope and seal the
return envelope;
(c) Affix his or her signature on the return envelope in the space
provided for the signature; [and]
(d) Write in the space provided on the return envelope one of
the following:
(1) The last four digits of his or her driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the last four digits of
his or her social security number; or
(3) If the voter does not have a driver’s license number
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a social security
number, the identification number issued by the county clerk
pursuant to NRS 293.507;
(e) Close the attached flap over the signature and identifying
numbers written on the return envelope; and
(f) Mail or deliver the return envelope in a manner authorized by
law.
2. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 293D of NRS,
voting must be only upon candidates whose names appear upon the
mail ballot as prepared pursuant to NRS 293C.263, and no person
may write in the name of an additional candidate for any office.
3. If a mail ballot has been sent to a voter who applies to vote
in person at a polling place, including, without limitation, a polling
place for early voting, the voter must, in addition to complying with
all other requirements for voting in person that are set forth in this
chapter, surrender his or her mail ballot or sign an affirmation under
penalty of perjury that the voter has not voted during the election. A
person who receives a surrendered mail ballot shall mark it
“Cancelled.”
-
*AB147*

– 41 –
Sec. 37. NRS 293C.26327 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26327 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293D.200, when a mail ballot is returned by or on behalf of a voter
to the city clerk, and a record of its return is made in the mail ballot
record for the election, the clerk or an employee in the office of the
clerk shall [check] :
(a) Verify that the last four digits of the driver’s license
number or social security number, as applicable, written on the
return envelope match the information of the voter in the records
of the city clerk;
(b) If, pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 of NRS 293C.26316, the voter has written the number
issued by the county clerk pursuant to NRS 293.507, verify that
the number matches the information of the voter in the records of
the city clerk; and
(c) Check the signature used for the mail ballot by electronic
means pursuant to subsection 2 or manually pursuant to
subsection 3.
2. To check the signature used for a mail ballot by electronic
means:
(a) The electronic device must take a digital image of the
signature used for the mail ballot and electronically compare the
digital image with the signatures of the voter from his or her
application to register to vote or application to preregister to vote
available in the records of the city clerk.
(b) If the electronic device does not match the signature of the
voter, the signature shall be reviewed manually pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 3.
3. To check the signature used for a mail ballot manually, the
city clerk shall use the following procedure:
(a) The clerk or employee shall check the signature used for the
mail ballot against all signatures of the voter available in the records
of the clerk.
(b) If at least two employees in the office of the clerk believe
there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, the clerk
shall contact the voter and ask the voter to confirm whether the
signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter.
4. For purposes of subsection 3:
(a) There is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if the signature used for the mail ballot differs in multiple,
significant and obvious respects from the signatures of the voter
available in the records of the clerk.
-
*AB147*

– 42 –
(b) There is not a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if:
(1) The signature used for the mail ballot is a variation of the
signature of the voter caused by the substitution of initials for the
first or middle name, the substitution of a different type of
punctuation in the first, middle or last name, the use of a common
nickname or the use of one last name for a person who has two last
names and it does not otherwise differ in multiple, significant and
obvious respects from the signatures of the voter available in the
records of the clerk; or
(2) There are only slight dissimilarities between the signature
used for the mail ballot and the signatures of the voter available in
the records of the clerk.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if the clerk
determines that the voter is entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk
shall deposit the mail ballot in the proper ballot box or place the
mail ballot, unopened, in a container that must be securely locked or
under the control of the clerk at all times. The clerk shall deliver the
mail ballots to the mail ballot central counting board to be processed
and prepared for counting.
6. If the clerk determines when checking the signature used for
the mail ballot that the voter failed to affix his or her signature or
failed to affix it in the manner required by law for the mail ballot or
that there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, but the
voter is otherwise entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk shall
contact the voter and advise the voter of the procedures to provide a
signature or a confirmation that the signature used for the mail ballot
belongs to the voter, as applicable. For the mail ballot to be counted,
the voter must provide a signature or a confirmation, as applicable,
not later than 5 p.m. on the sixth day following the election.
7. The clerk shall prescribe procedures for a voter who failed to
affix his or her signature or failed to affix it in the manner required
by law for the mail ballot, or for whom there is a reasonable
question of fact as to whether the signature used for the mail ballot
matches the signature of the voter, in order to:
(a) Contact the voter;
(b) Allow the voter to provide a signature or a confirmation that
the signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter, as
applicable; and
(c) After a signature or a confirmation is provided, as applicable,
ensure the mail ballot is delivered to the mail ballot central counting
board.
-
*AB147*

– 43 –
8. If there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter,
the voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the city clerk covering the
personal data which is reported on the application to register to vote;
(b) Providing the city clerk, orally or in writing, with other
personal data which verifies the identity of the voter; or
(c) [Providing] Presenting the city clerk with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
9. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 7 for
contacting a voter must require the clerk to contact the voter, as
soon as possible after receipt of the mail ballot, by:
(a) Mail;
(b) Telephone, if a telephone number for the voter is available in
the records of the clerk; and
(c) Electronic means, which may include, without limitation,
electronic mail, if the voter has provided the clerk with sufficient
information to contact the voter by such means.
Sec. 38. NRS 293C.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.270 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272, if a person’s name appears in
the roster or if the person provides an affirmation pursuant to NRS
293C.525, the person is entitled to vote and must [sign] :
(a) Present proof of identity; and
(b) Sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature card
when he or she applies to vote. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 293.57691, the signature must be compared by an election
board officer with the signature or a facsimile thereof on the
person’s application to register to vote or [one of the forms of
identification listed in subsection 2.] on his or her proof of identity.
2. [The forms of identification that may be used to identify a
voter at the polling place are:
(a) The voter registration card issued to the voter;
(b) A driver’s license;
(c) An identification card issued by the Department of Motor
Vehicles;
(d) A military identification card; or
(e) Any other form of identification issued by a governmental
agency that contains the voter’s signature and physical description
or picture.
3.] The city clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by the
Secretary of State, to verify that the voter has not already voted in
that city in the current election.
-
*AB147*

– 44 –
Sec. 39. NRS 293C.272 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.272 1. If, because of physical limitations, a registered
voter is unable to sign his or her name in the roster or on a signature
card as required by NRS 293C.270, the voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote;
(b) Providing the election board officer, orally or in writing,
with other personal data which verifies the identity of the voter; or
(c) [Providing] Presenting the election board officer with his or
her proof of [identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other
than the voter registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
2. If the identity of the voter is verified, the election board
officer shall indicate in the roster “Identified” by the voter’s name.
Sec. 40. NRS 293C.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.275 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272:
(a) A registered voter who applies to vote must state his or her
name to the election board officer in charge of the roster; and
(b) The election board officer shall:
(1) Announce the name of the registered voter;
(2) Require that the registered voter present proof of
identity;
(3) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or signature
card;
[(3)] (4) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293C.270; and
[(4)] (5) Verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that city in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature does not match, the registered voter must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
-
*AB147*

– 45 –
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
Sec. 41. NRS 293C.277 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.277 1. A registered voter who applies to vote at an
election must give his or her name to the election board officer in
charge of the roster, and the officer shall immediately announce the
name of the registered voter [.] and require that the registered
voter present proof of identity.
2. Any person’s right to vote may be challenged by a registered
voter upon any of the grounds allowed for a challenge in NRS
293C.292. Any such challenge must be disposed of in the manner
provided in NRS 293C.292.
Sec. 42. NRS 293C.292 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.292 1. A person applying to vote may be challenged:
(a) Orally by any registered voter of the precinct or district upon
the ground that he or she is not the person entitled to vote as claimed
or has voted before at the same election; or
(b) On any ground set forth in a challenge filed with the county
clerk pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.547.
2. If a person is challenged, an election board officer shall
tender the challenged person the following oath or affirmation:
(a) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not reside at the residence for which the address is listed in the
roster, “I swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I reside at the
residence for which the address is listed in the roster”;
(b) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
previously voted a ballot for the election, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I have not voted for any of the candidates or
questions included on this ballot for this election”; or
(c) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person is
not the person he or she claims to be, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I am the person whose name is in this roster.”
 The oath or affirmation must be set forth on a form prepared by
the Secretary of State and signed by the challenged person under
penalty of perjury.
3. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation so tendered, the person must not be issued a ballot, and
the election board officer shall indicate in the roster “Challenged”
by the person’s name.
4. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 2, the election
board officers shall inform the person that he or she is entitled to
vote only in the manner prescribed in NRS 293C.295.
-
*AB147*

– 46 –
5. If the challenged person executes the oath or affirmation and
the challenge is not based on the ground set forth in paragraph (c) of
subsection 2, the election board officers shall issue him or her a
ballot.
6. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(a) of subsection 2, and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
until he or she furnishes satisfactory identification that contains
proof of the address at which the person actually resides. For the
purposes of this subsection, a voter registration card does not
provide proof of the address at which a person resides.
7. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(c) of subsection 2 and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
unless the person [:
(a) Furnishes official identification which contains a photograph
of the person, such as a driver’s license or other official document;
or
(b) Brings before the election board officers a person who is at
least 18 years of age who:
(1) Furnishes official identification which contains a
photograph of the person, such as a driver’s license or other official
document; and
(2) Executes an oath or affirmation under penalty of perjury
that the challenged person is who he or she swears to be.] furnishes
proof of identity.
8. The election board officers shall:
(a) Record on the challenge list:
(1) The name of the challenged person;
(2) The name of the registered voter who initiated the
challenge; and
(3) The result of the challenge; and
(b) If possible, orally notify the registered voter who initiated
the challenge of the result of the challenge.
Sec. 43. NRS 293C.3035 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.3035 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot at a polling place established pursuant to NRS
293C.3032, if any, the election board officer shall:
(a) Determine [that] whether the person is a registered voter in
the city and has not already voted in that city in the current election;
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity;
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster or a signature
card; and
-
*AB147*

– 47 –
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293C.270.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature of the registered voter does not match, the registered voter
must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The city clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by the
Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that city in the current election.
5. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
where he or she applies to vote.
6. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical voting device for the registered
voter;
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district
and the form of the ballot are indicated on the voting receipt, if the
city clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
7. A registered voter applying to vote at a polling place
established pursuant to NRS 293C.3032, if any, may be challenged
pursuant to NRS 293C.292.
Sec. 44. NRS 293C.356 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.356 1. If a request is made to vote early by a registered
voter in person, the city clerk shall , except as otherwise provided in
NRS 293C.3585, issue a ballot for early voting to the voter. Such a
-
*AB147*

– 48 –
ballot must be voted on the premises of the clerk’s office and
returned to the clerk.
2. On the dates for early voting prescribed in NRS 293C.3568,
each city clerk shall provide a voting booth, with suitable equipment
for voting, on the premises of the city clerk’s office for use by
registered voters who are issued ballots for early voting in
accordance with this section.
Sec. 45. NRS 293C.3585 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.3585 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.272, upon the appearance of a
person to cast a ballot for early voting, an election board officer
shall:
(a) Determine that the person is a registered voter in the county.
(b) Require the registered voter to present proof of identity.
(c) Instruct the registered voter to sign the roster for early voting
or a signature card.
[(c)] (d) Verify the signature of the registered voter in the
manner set forth in NRS 293C.270.
[(d)] (e) Verify that the registered voter has not already voted in
that city in the current election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.57691, if the
signature does not match, the registered voter must be identified by:
(a) Either:
(1) Answering questions from the election board officer
covering the personal data which is reported on the application to
register to vote; or
[(b)] (2) Providing the election board officer, orally or in
writing, with other personal data which verifies the identity of the
registered voter; [or
(c) Providing] and
(b) Presenting the election board officer with proof of
[identification as described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter
registration card issued to the voter.] identity.
3. If the signature of the registered voter has changed in
comparison to the signature on the application to register to vote, the
registered voter must update his or her signature on a form
prescribed by the Secretary of State.
4. The city clerk shall prescribe a procedure, approved by the
Secretary of State, to verify that the registered voter has not already
voted in that city in the current election.
5. The roster for early voting or signature card, as applicable,
must contain:
-
*AB147*

– 49 –
(a) The registered voter’s name, the address where he or she is
registered to vote, his or her voter identification number and a place
for the registered voter’s signature;
(b) The registered voter’s precinct or voting district number, if
that information is available; and
(c) The date of voting early in person.
6. When a registered voter is entitled to cast a ballot and has
identified himself or herself to the satisfaction of the election board
officer, the registered voter is entitled to receive the appropriate
ballot or ballots, but only for his or her own use at the polling place
for early voting.
7. If the ballot is voted on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically, the election board officer
shall:
(a) Prepare the mechanical recording device for the registered
voter;
(b) Ensure that the registered voter’s precinct or voting district,
if that information is available, and the form of ballot are indicated
on the voting receipt, if the city clerk uses voting receipts; and
(c) Allow the registered voter to cast a vote.
8. A registered voter applying to vote early by personal
appearance may be challenged pursuant to NRS 293C.292.
9. For the purposes of subsection 2, the personal data of a
registered voter may include his or her date of birth.
Sec. 46. NRS 483.820 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.820 1. A person who applies for an identification card in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 483.810 to 483.890,
inclusive, and who is not ineligible to receive an identification card
pursuant to NRS 483.861, is entitled to receive an identification card
if the person is:
(a) A resident of this State and is 10 years of age or older and
does not hold a valid driver’s license or identification card from any
state or jurisdiction; or
(b) A seasonal resident who does not hold a valid Nevada
driver’s license.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.825 [,] and
section 3 of this act, the Department shall charge and collect the
following fees for the issuance of an original, duplicate or changed
identification card:

An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person 65 years of age or older
which expires on or before the fourth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ............................... $4
-
*AB147*

– 50 –
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person 65 years of age or older
which expires on or before the eighth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ............................... $8
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person under 18 years of age
which expires on the eighth anniversary of
the person’s birthday ......................................................... 6
A renewal of an identification card for a person
under 18 years of age which expires on the
eighth anniversary of the person’s birthday ...................... 6
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to a person under 18 years of age
which expires on or before the fourth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ................................. 3
A renewal of an identification card for a person
under 18 years of age which expires on or
before the fourth anniversary of the
person’s birthday ............................................................... 3
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to any person at least 18 years of
age, but less than 65 years of age, which
expires on the eighth anniversary of the
person’s birthday ............................................................. 18
A renewal of an identification card for any
person at least 18 years of age, but less than
65 years of age, which expires on the eighth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ............................... 18
An original or duplicate identification card
issued to any person at least 18 years of
age, but less than 65 years of age, which
expires on or before the fourth anniversary
of the person’s birthday ..................................................... 9
A renewal of an identification card for any
person at least 18 years of age, but less than
65 years of age, which expires on or before
the fourth anniversary of the person’s
birthday ............................................................................. 9
A new photograph or change of name, or both ...................... 4

3. The Department shall not charge a fee for:
(a) An identification card issued to a person who has voluntarily
surrendered his or her driver’s license pursuant to NRS 483.420; or
(b) A renewal of an identification card for a person 65 years of
age or older.
-
*AB147*

– 51 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.825 [,] and
section 3 of this act, the increase in fees authorized in NRS 483.347
must be paid in addition to the fees charged pursuant to this section.
5. As used in this section, “photograph” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 483.125.
Sec. 47. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 46, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB147*